Florida, session 2026, HB1071.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
133
134 Section 1. Section 1001.325, Florida Statutes, is created
135 to read:
136 1001.325 K-12 prohibited expenditures.—
137 (1) A public school, including a charter school, school
138 district, charter school administrator, or direct-support
139 organization for any such school or school district may not
140 expend any funds, regardless of source, to purchase membership
141 in, or goods and services from, any organization that
142 discriminates on the basis of race, color, national origin, sex,
143 disability, or religion.
144 (2) A public school, including a charter school, school
145 district, charter school administrator, or direct-support
146 organization for any such school or school district may not
147 expend any state or federal funds to promote, support, or
148 maintain any programs or campus activities that:
149 (a) Violate s. 1000.05; or
150 (b) Advocate for diversity, equity, and inclusion, or
Page 6 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
151 promote or engage in political or social activism, as defined by
152 the State Board of Education.
153
154 Student fees to support student-led organizations are permitted
155 notwithstanding any speech or expressive activity by such
156 organization which would otherwise violate this subsection,
157 provided that the public funds must be allocated to student-led
158 organizations pursuant to written policies or regulations of the
159 public school in which the student is enrolled or the school
160 district, as applicable. Use of school or school district
161 facilities by student-led organizations is permitted
162 notwithstanding any speech or expressive activity by such
163 organizations which would otherwise violate this subsection,
164 provided that such use must be granted to student-led
165 organizations pursuant to written policies or regulations of
166 each school or school district, as applicable.
167 (3) Subsection (2) does not prohibit programs, campus
168 activities, or functions required for compliance with general or
169 federal laws or regulations; for obtaining or retaining
170 accreditation and for continuing to receive state funds with the
171 approval of either the State Board of Education or the
172 Department of Education.
173 (4) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules to
174 implement this section.
175 Section 2. Paragraph (a) of subsection (17) and
Page 7 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
176 subsections (21) and (23) of section 1001.42, Florida Statutes,
177 are amended to read:
178 1001.42 Powers and duties of district school board.—The
179 district school board, acting as a board, shall exercise all
180 powers and perform all duties listed below:
181 (17) PUBLIC INFORMATION AND PARENTAL INVOLVEMENT PROGRAM.—
182 (a) Adopt procedures whereby the general public can be
183 adequately informed of the educational programs, needs, and
184 objectives of public education within the district, including
185 educational opportunities available through approved virtual
186 instruction program providers under s. 1002.45 or the school
187 district's virtual instruction program the Florida Virtual
188 School.
189 (21) EDUCATIONAL EMERGENCY.—To free schools that have with
190 a school grade of "D" or "F" or are persistently low-performing
191 schools as described in s. 1002.333 from contract restrictions
192 that limit the school district's school's ability to implement
193 programs and strategies needed to improve student performance, a
194 district school board may adopt salary incentives or other
195 strategies that address the selection, placement, compensation,
196 and expectations of instructional personnel and provide
197 principals with the autonomy described in s. 1012.28(8). For
198 purposes of this subsection, an educational emergency exists in
199 a school district if one or more schools in the district have a
200 school grade of "D" or "F" or are persistently low-performing
Page 8 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
201 schools as described in s. 1002.333. "F." Notwithstanding
202 chapter 447, relating to collective bargaining, a district
203 school board may:
204 (a) Provide salary incentives that differentiate based on
205 a teacher's certification, subject area taught, or grade level
206 taught. Such incentives are not subject to collective bargaining
207 requirements.
208 (b) Notwithstanding s. 1012.2315, relating to assignment
209 of teachers, adopt strategies to assign high-quality teachers
210 more equitably across schools in the district to low-performing
211 schools as a management right. Such strategies are not subject
212 to collective bargaining requirements.
213 (23) VIRTUAL INSTRUCTION.—Provide students with access to
214 courses available through the school district's a virtual
215 instruction program option or an approved virtual instruction
216 program provider under s. 1002.45, including the Florida Virtual
217 School and other approved providers, and award credit for
218 successful completion of such courses.
219 Section 3. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
220 1001.452, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
221 1001.452 District and school advisory councils.—
222 (1) ESTABLISHMENT.—
223 (a) The district school board shall establish an advisory
224 council for each school in the district and shall develop
225 procedures for the election and appointment of advisory council
Page 9 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
226 members. Each school advisory council shall include in its name
227 the words "school advisory council." The school advisory council
228 shall be the sole body responsible for final decisionmaking at
229 the school relating to implementation of ss. 1001.42(18) and
230 1008.345. A majority of the members of each school advisory
231 council must be persons who are not employed by the school
232 district. Each advisory council shall be composed of the
233 principal and an appropriately balanced number of teachers,
234 education support employees, students, parents, and other
235 business and community citizens who are representative of the
236 ethnic, racial, and economic community served by the school.
237 Career center and high school advisory councils shall include
238 students, and middle and junior high school advisory councils
239 may include students. School advisory councils of career centers
240 and adult education centers are not required to include parents
241 as members. Council members representing teachers, education
242 support employees, students, and parents shall be elected by
243 their respective peer groups at the school in a fair and
244 equitable manner as follows:
245 1. Teachers shall be elected by teachers.
246 2. Education support employees shall be elected by
247 education support employees.
248 3. Students shall be elected by students.
249 4. Parents shall be elected by parents.
250
Page 10 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
251 The district school board shall establish procedures to be
252 used by schools in selecting business and community members
253 which include means of ensuring wide notice of vacancies and of
254 taking input on possible members from local business, chambers
255 of commerce, community and civic organizations and groups, and
256 the public at large. The district school board shall review the
257 membership composition of each advisory council. If the district
258 school board determines that the membership elected by the
259 school is not representative of the ethnic, racial, and economic
260 community served by the school, the district school board must
261 appoint additional members to achieve proper representation.
262 Although schools are strongly encouraged to establish school
263 advisory councils, the district school board of any school
264 district that has a student population of 10,000 or less may
265 establish a district advisory council which includes at least
266 one duly elected teacher from each school in the district. For
267 the purposes of school advisory councils and district advisory
268 councils, the term "teacher" includes classroom teachers,
269 certified student services personnel, and media specialists. For
270 purposes of this paragraph, the term "education support
271 employee" means any person employed by a school who is not
272 defined as instructional or administrative personnel pursuant to
273 s. 1012.01 and whose duties require 20 or more hours in each
274 normal working week.
275 Section 4. Paragraphs (d) and (i) of subsection (3) of
Page 11 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
276 section 1002.20, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
277 1002.20 K-12 student and parent rights.—Parents of public
278 school students must receive accurate and timely information
279 regarding their child's academic progress and must be informed
280 of ways they can help their child to succeed in school. K-12
281 students and their parents are afforded numerous statutory
282 rights including, but not limited to, the following:
283 (3) HEALTH ISSUES.—
284 (d) Reproductive health and disease education.—A public
285 school student whose parent makes written request to the school
286 principal shall be exempted from the teaching of reproductive
287 health, including instruction in human embryologic and fetal
288 development under s. 1003.42(2)(o)6., or any disease, including
289 HIV/AIDS, in accordance with s. 1003.42(5).
290 1. Each school district must shall, on the district's
291 website homepage, notify parents of this right and the process
292 to request an exemption. The homepage must include a link for a
293 student's parent to access and review the instructional
294 materials, as defined in s. 1006.29(2), used to teach the
295 curriculum.
296 2. Each school district shall annually review and confirm
297 that the information provided on the district's website homepage
298 under subparagraph 1. is accurate and up to date and shall
299 notify parents by physical or electronic means any time
300 revisions are made to such information.
Page 12 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
301 (i) Epinephrine use and supply.—
302 1. A student who has experienced or is at risk for life-
303 threatening allergic reactions may carry a United States Food
304 and Drug Administration (FDA)-approved an epinephrine delivery
305 device auto-injector and self-administer epinephrine by use of
306 the device auto-injector while in school, participating in
307 school-sponsored activities, or in transit to or from school or
308 school-sponsored activities if the school has been provided with
309 parental and physician authorization. The State Board of
310 Education, in cooperation with the Department of Health, shall
311 adopt rules for such use of FDA-approved epinephrine delivery
312 devices auto-injectors that shall include provisions to protect
313 the safety of all students from the misuse or abuse of FDA-
314 approved delivery devices auto-injectors. A school district,
315 county health department, public-private partner, and their
316 employees and volunteers shall be indemnified by the parent of a
317 student authorized to carry an FDA-approved epinephrine delivery
318 device auto-injector for any and all liability with respect to
319 the student's use of an FDA-approve epinephrine delivery device
320 auto-injector pursuant to this paragraph.
321 2. A public school may purchase a supply of FDA-approved
322 epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors from a wholesale
323 distributor as defined in s. 499.003 or may enter into an
324 arrangement with a wholesale distributor or manufacturer as
325 defined in s. 499.003 for the FDA-approved epinephrine delivery
Page 13 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
326 devices auto-injectors at fair-market, free, or reduced prices
327 for use in the event a student has an anaphylactic reaction. The
328 FDA-approved epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors must be
329 maintained in a secure location on the public school's premises.
330 The participating school district shall adopt a protocol
331 developed by a licensed physician for the administration by
332 school personnel who are trained to recognize an anaphylactic
333 reaction and to administer an FDA-approved epinephrine delivery
334 device auto-injection. The supply of FDA-approved epinephrine
335 delivery devices auto-injectors may be provided to and used by a
336 student authorized to self-administer epinephrine by such device
337 auto-injector under subparagraph 1. or trained school personnel.
338 3. The school district and its employees, agents, and the
339 physician who provides the standing protocol for school FDA-
340 approved epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors are not
341 liable for any injury arising from the use of an FDA-approved
342 epinephrine delivery device auto-injector administered by
343 trained school personnel who follow the adopted protocol and
344 whose professional opinion is that the student is having an
345 anaphylactic reaction:
346 a. Unless the trained school personnel's action is willful
347 and wanton;
348 b. Notwithstanding that the parents or guardians of the
349 student to whom the epinephrine is administered have not been
350 provided notice or have not signed a statement acknowledging
Page 14 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
351 that the school district is not liable; and
352 c. Regardless of whether authorization has been given by
353 the student's parents or guardians or by the student's
354 physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered
355 nurse.
356 Section 5. Subsection (4) of section 1002.32, Florida
357 Statutes, is amended to read:
358 1002.32 Developmental research (laboratory) schools.—
359 (4) STUDENT ADMISSIONS.—Each lab school may establish a
360 primary research objective related to fundamental issues and
361 problems that occur in the public elementary and secondary
362 schools of the state. Admissions criteria should reflect an
363 emphasis on student merit and achievement with no regard to
364 race, sex, creed, color, or national origin. Lab schools may not
365 use racial or sex set-asides, preferences, or quotas in their
366 admissions process. A student population reflective of the
367 student population of the public school environment in which the
368 issues and problems are most prevalent shall be promoted and
369 encouraged through the establishment and implementation of an
370 admission process that is designed to result in a representative
371 sample of public school enrollment based on gender, race,
372 socioeconomic status, and academic ability, notwithstanding the
373 provisions of s. 1000.05.
374 Section 6. Paragraph (e) of subsection (10) of section
375 1002.33, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 15 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
376 1002.33 Charter schools.—
377 (10) ELIGIBLE STUDENTS.—
378 (e) A charter school may limit the enrollment process only
379 to target the following student populations:
380 1. Students within specific age groups or grade levels.
381 2. Students considered at risk of dropping out of school
382 or academic failure. Such students shall include exceptional
383 education students.
384 3. Students enrolling in a charter school-in-the-workplace
385 or charter school-in-a-municipality established pursuant to
386 subsection (15).
387 4. Students residing within a reasonable distance of the
388 charter school, as described in paragraph (20)(c). Such students
389 shall be subject to a random lottery and to the racial/ethnic
390 balance provisions described in subparagraph (7)(a)8. or any
391 federal provisions that require a school to achieve a
392 racial/ethnic balance reflective of the community it serves or
393 within the racial/ethnic range of other nearby public schools.
394 5. Students who meet reasonable academic, artistic, or
395 other eligibility standards established by the charter school
396 and included in the charter school application and charter or,
397 in the case of existing charter schools, standards that are
398 consistent with the school's mission and purpose. Such standards
399 shall be in accordance with current state law and practice in
400 public schools and may not discriminate against otherwise
Page 16 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
401 qualified individuals. A school that limits enrollment for such
402 purposes must place a student on a progress monitoring plan for
403 at least one semester before dismissing such student from the
404 school. A student may not be dismissed based on academic
405 performance while a school is implementing a school improvement
406 plan pursuant to paragraph (9)(n) or corrective action plan
407 pursuant to s. 1002.345.
408 6. Students articulating from one charter school to
409 another pursuant to an articulation agreement between the
410 charter schools that has been approved by the sponsor.
411 7. Students living in a development, or students whose
412 parent or legal guardian maintains a physical or permanent
413 employment presence within the development, in which a
414 developer, including any affiliated business entity or
415 charitable foundation, contributes to the formation,
416 acquisition, construction, or operation of one or more charter
417 schools or charter school facilities and related property in an
418 amount equal to or having a total appraised value of at least $5
419 million to be used as charter schools to mitigate the
420 educational impact created by the development of new residential
421 dwelling units. Students living in the development are entitled
422 to 50 percent of the student stations in the charter schools.
423 The students who are eligible for enrollment are subject to a
424 random lottery, the racial/ethnic balance provisions, or any
425 federal provisions, as described in subparagraph 4. The
Page 17 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
426 remainder of the student stations must be filled in accordance
427 with subparagraph 4.
428 8. Students whose parent or legal guardian is employed
429 within a reasonable distance of the charter school, as described
430 in paragraph (20)(c). The students who are eligible for
431 enrollment are subject to a random lottery.
432 Section 7. Subsection (17) of section 1002.42, Florida
433 Statutes, is amended to read:
434 1002.42 Private schools.—
435 (17) EPINEPHRINE SUPPLY.—
436 (a) A private school may purchase a supply of United
437 States Food and Drug Administration (FDA)-approved epinephrine
438 delivery devices auto-injectors from a wholesale distributor as
439 defined in s. 499.003 or may enter into an arrangement with a
440 wholesale distributor or manufacturer as defined in s. 499.003
441 for the FDA-approved epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors
442 at fair-market, free, or reduced prices for use in the event a
443 student has an anaphylactic reaction. The FDA-approved
444 epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors must be maintained
445 in a secure location on the private school's premises. The
446 participating private school shall adopt a protocol developed by
447 a licensed physician for the administration by private school
448 personnel who are trained to recognize an anaphylactic reaction
449 and to administer an FDA-approved epinephrine delivery devices
450 auto-injection. The supply of FDA-approved epinephrine delivery
Page 18 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
451 devices auto-injectors may be provided to and used by a student
452 authorized to self-administer epinephrine by an FDA-approved
453 delivery device auto-injector under s. 1002.20(3)(i) or trained
454 school personnel.
455 (b) The private school and its employees, agents, and the
456 physician who provides the standing protocol for school FDA-
457 approved epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors are not
458 liable for any injury arising from the use of an FDA-approved
459 epinephrine delivery device auto-injector administered by
460 trained school personnel who follow the adopted protocol and
461 whose professional opinion is that the student is having an
462 anaphylactic reaction:
463 1. Unless the trained school personnel's action is willful
464 and wanton;
465 2. Notwithstanding that the parents or guardians of the
466 student to whom the epinephrine is administered have not been
467 provided notice or have not signed a statement acknowledging
468 that the school district is not liable; and
469 3. Regardless of whether authorization has been given by
470 the student's parents or guardians or by the student's
471 physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered
472 nurse.
473 Section 8. Paragraph (i) of subsection (1) of section
474 1002.421, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
475 1002.421 State school choice scholarship program
Page 19 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
476 accountability and oversight.—
477 (1) PRIVATE SCHOOL ELIGIBILITY AND OBLIGATIONS.—A private
478 school participating in an educational scholarship program
479 established pursuant to this chapter must be a private school as
480 defined in s. 1002.01 in this state, be registered, and be in
481 compliance with all requirements of this section in addition to
482 private school requirements outlined in s. 1002.42, specific
483 requirements identified within respective scholarship program
484 laws, and other provisions of Florida law that apply to private
485 schools, and must:
486 (i) Maintain a physical location in the state at which
487 each student has regular and direct contact with teachers.
488 Regular and direct contact with teachers may be satisfied for
489 students enrolled in a personalized education program or for
490 students eligible for a scholarship under s. 1002.394(3)(b) if
491 students have regular and direct contact with teachers at the
492 physical location at least 2 school days per week and the
493 student learning plan addresses the remaining instructional
494 time.
495
496 The department shall suspend the payment of funds to a private
497 school that knowingly fails to comply with this subsection, and
498 shall prohibit the school from enrolling new scholarship
499 students, for 1 fiscal year and until the school complies. If a
500 private school fails to meet the requirements of this subsection
Page 20 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
501 or has consecutive years of material exceptions listed in the
502 report required under paragraph (q), the commissioner may
503 determine that the private school is ineligible to participate
504 in a scholarship program.
505 Section 9. Subsection (6) of section 1002.55, Florida
506 Statutes, is amended to read:
507 1002.55 School-year prekindergarten program delivered by
508 private prekindergarten providers.—
509 (6) Each early learning coalition must verify that each
510 private prekindergarten provider delivering the Voluntary
511 Prekindergarten Education Program within the coalition's county
512 or multicounty region complies with this part. If a private
513 prekindergarten provider fails or refuses to comply with this
514 part or engages in misconduct, the department shall require the
515 early learning coalition to remove the provider from eligibility
516 to deliver the program and receive state funds under this part
517 for a period of at least 2 program years but no more than 5
518 years.
519 Section 10. Paragraph (b) of subsection (10) of section
520 1002.61, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
521 1002.61 Summer prekindergarten program delivered by public
522 schools and private prekindergarten providers.—
523 (10)
524 (b) If a private prekindergarten provider or public school
525 fails or refuses to comply with this part or engages in
Page 21 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
526 misconduct, the department shall require the early learning
527 coalition to remove the provider and require the school district
528 to remove the school from eligibility to deliver the Voluntary
529 Prekindergarten Education Program and receive state funds under
530 this part for a period of at least 2 program years but no more
531 than 5 years.
532 Section 11. Paragraph (b) of subsection (9) of section
533 1002.63, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
534 1002.63 School-year prekindergarten program delivered by
535 public schools.—
536 (9)
537 (b) If a public school fails or refuses to comply with
538 this part or engages in misconduct, the department shall require
539 the school district to remove the school from eligibility to
540 deliver the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program and
541 receive state funds under this part for a period of at least 2
542 program years but no more than 5 years.
543 Section 12. Subsections (4) through (7) of section
544 1002.68, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (3)
545 through (6), respectively, and subsection (3), paragraph (e) of
546 present subsection (4), present subsection (5), and paragraph
547 (e) of present subsection (6) are amended, to read:
548 1002.68 Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program
549 accountability.—
550 (3)(a) For the 2020-2021 program year, the department
Page 22 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
551 shall calculate a kindergarten readiness rate for each private
552 prekindergarten provider and public school participating in the
553 Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program based upon learning
554 gains and the percentage of students assessed as ready for
555 kindergarten. The department shall require that each school
556 district administer the statewide kindergarten screening in use
557 before the 2021-2022 school year to each kindergarten student in
558 the school district within the first 30 school days of the 2021-
559 2022 school year. Private schools may administer the statewide
560 kindergarten screening to each kindergarten student in a private
561 school who was enrolled in the Voluntary Prekindergarten
562 Education Program. Learning gains shall be determined using a
563 value-added measure based on growth demonstrated by the results
564 of the preassessment and postassessment in use before the 2021-
565 2022 program year. However, a provider may not be newly placed
566 on probationary status under this paragraph. A provider
567 currently on probationary status may only be removed from such
568 status if the provider earns the minimum rate, determined
569 pursuant to subsection (5). The methodology for calculating a
570 provider's readiness rate may not include students who are not
571 administered the statewide kindergarten screening.
572 (b) For the 2021-2022 program year, kindergarten screening
573 results may not be used in the calculation of readiness rates.
574 Any private prekindergarten provider or public school
575 participating in the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program
Page 23 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
576 which fails to meet the minimum kindergarten readiness rate for
577 the 2021-2022 program year is subject to the probation
578 requirements of subsection (5).
579 (3)(4)
580 (e) Subject to an appropriation, the department shall
581 provide for a differential payment to a private prekindergarten
582 provider and public school based on the provider's designation.
583 The maximum differential payment may not exceed a total of 15
584 percent of the base student allocation per full-time equivalent
585 student under s. 1002.71 attending in the consecutive program
586 year for that program. A private prekindergarten provider or
587 public school may not receive a differential payment if it
588 receives a designation of "proficient" or lower. Before the
589 adoption of the methodology, the department shall confer with
590 the Council for Early Grade Success under s. 1008.2125 before
591 receiving approval from the State Board of Education for the
592 final recommendations on the designation system and differential
593 payments.
594 (4)(a)(5)(a) If a public school's or private
595 prekindergarten provider's program assessment composite score
596 for its prekindergarten classrooms fails to meet the minimum
597 program assessment composite score for contracting adopted in
598 rule by the department, the private prekindergarten provider or
599 public school may not participate in the Voluntary
600 Prekindergarten Education Program beginning in the consecutive
Page 24 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
601 program year for a period of 2 program years and thereafter
602 until the public school or private prekindergarten provider
603 meets the minimum composite score for contracting. A public
604 school or private prekindergarten provider may request one
605 program assessment per program year in order to requalify for
606 participation in the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education
607 Program, provided that the public school or private
608 prekindergarten provider is not excluded from participation
609 under ss. 1002.55(6), 1002.61(10)(b), 1002.63(9)(b), or
610 paragraph (b) (5)(b) of this section. If a public school or
611 private prekindergarten provider would like an additional
612 program assessment completed within the same program year, the
613 public school or private prekindergarten provider shall be
614 responsible for the cost of the program assessment.
615 (b) If a private prekindergarten provider's or public
616 school's performance metric or designation falls below the
617 minimum performance metric or designation, the early learning
618 coalition shall:
619 1. Require the provider or school to submit for approval
620 to the early learning coalition an improvement plan and
621 implement the plan.
622 2. Place the provider or school on probation.
623 3. Require the provider or school to take certain
624 corrective actions, including the use of a curriculum approved
625 by the department under s. 1002.67(2)(c) and a staff development
Page 25 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
626 plan approved by the department to strengthen instructional
627 practices in emotional support, classroom organization,
628 instructional support, language development, phonological
629 awareness, alphabet knowledge, and mathematical thinking.
630 (c) A private prekindergarten provider or public school
631 that is placed on probation must continue the corrective actions
632 required under paragraph (b) until the provider or school meets
633 the minimum performance metric or designation adopted by the
634 department. Failure to meet the requirements of subparagraphs
635 (b)1. and 3. shall result in the termination of the provider's
636 or school's contract to deliver the Voluntary Prekindergarten
637 Education Program for a period of at least 2 program years but
638 no more than 5 years.
639 (d) If a private prekindergarten provider or public school
640 remains on probation for 2 consecutive years and fails to meet
641 the minimum performance metric or designation, or is not granted
642 a good cause exemption by the department, the department shall
643 require the early learning coalition to revoke the provider's
644 eligibility and the school district to revoke the school's
645 eligibility to deliver the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education
646 Program and receive state funds for the program for a period of
647 at least 2 program years but no more than 5 years.
648 (5)(6)
649 (e) A private prekindergarten provider or public school
650 granted a good cause exemption shall continue to implement its
Page 26 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
651 improvement plan and continue the corrective actions required
652 under paragraph (4)(b) (5)(b) until the provider or school meets
653 the minimum performance metric.
654 Section 13. Paragraph (m) of subsection (2) of section
655 1002.82, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
656 1002.82 Department of Education; powers and duties.—
657 (2) The department shall:
658 (m) Provide technical support to an early learning
659 coalition to facilitate the use of a standard statewide provider
660 contract adopted by the department to be used with each school
661 readiness program provider, with standardized attachments by
662 provider type. The department shall publish a copy of the
663 standard statewide provider contract on its website. The
664 standard statewide contract shall include, at a minimum,
665 contracted slots, if applicable, in accordance with the Child
666 Care and Development Block Grant Act of 2014, 45 C.F.R. parts 98
667 and 99; quality improvement strategies, if applicable; program
668 assessment requirements; and provisions for provider probation,
669 termination for cause, and emergency termination for those
670 actions or inactions of a provider that pose an immediate and
671 serious danger to the health, safety, or welfare of the
672 children. The standard statewide provider contract shall also
673 include appropriate due process procedures. During the pendency
674 of an appeal of a termination, the provider may not continue to
675 offer its services. Any provision imposed upon a provider that
Page 27 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
676 is inconsistent with, or prohibited by, law is void and
677 unenforceable. Provisions for termination for cause must also
678 include failure to meet the minimum quality measures established
679 under paragraph (n) for a period of 2 up to 5 years, unless the
680 coalition determines that the provider is essential to meeting
681 capacity needs based on the assessment under s. 1002.85(2)(i)
682 and the provider has an active improvement plan pursuant to
683 paragraph (n).
684 Section 14. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
685 1002.88, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
686 1002.88 School readiness program provider standards;
687 eligibility to deliver the school readiness program.—
688 (2)(a) If a school readiness program provider fails or
689 refuses to comply with this part or any contractual obligation
690 of the statewide provider contract under s. 1002.82(2)(m), the
691 coalition may revoke the provider's eligibility to deliver the
692 school readiness program or receive state or federal funds under
693 this chapter for a period of 2 5 years.
694 Section 15. Subsection (5) of section 1002.91, Florida
695 Statutes, is amended to read:
696 1002.91 Investigations of fraud or overpayment;
697 penalties.—
698 (5) If a school readiness program provider or a Voluntary
699 Prekindergarten Education Program provider, or an owner,
700 officer, or director thereof, is convicted of, found guilty of,
Page 28 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
701 or pleads guilty or nolo contendere to, regardless of
702 adjudication, public assistance fraud pursuant to s. 414.39, or
703 is acting as the beneficial owner for someone who has been
704 convicted of, found guilty of, or pleads guilty or nolo
705 contendere to, regardless of adjudication, public assistance
706 fraud pursuant to s. 414.39, the early learning coalition shall
707 refrain from contracting with, or using the services of, that
708 provider for a period of 2 fiscal 5 years. In addition, the
709 coalition shall refrain from contracting with, or using the
710 services of, any provider that shares an officer or director
711 with a provider that is convicted of, found guilty of, or pleads
712 guilty or nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, public
713 assistance fraud pursuant to s. 414.39 for a period of 2 5
714 years.
715 Section 16. Paragraph (b) of subsection (3) and paragraphs
716 (a) and (d) of subsection (4) of section 1002.945, Florida
717 Statutes, are amended to read:
718 1002.945 Gold Seal Quality Care Program.—
719 (3)
720 (b) The Department of Education shall establish a process
721 that verifies that the accrediting association meets the
722 provisions of paragraph (a), which must include an auditing
723 program and any other procedures that may reasonably determine
724 an accrediting association's compliance with this section. If an
725 accrediting association is not in compliance and fails to cure
Page 29 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
726 its deficiencies within 30 days, the department shall recommend
727 to the state board termination of the accrediting association's
728 participation as an accrediting association in the program for a
729 period of at least 2 years but no more than 5 years. If an
730 accrediting association is removed from being an approved
731 accrediting association, each child care provider accredited by
732 that association shall have up to 1 year to obtain a new
733 accreditation from a department-approved accreditation
734 association.
735 (4) In order to obtain and maintain a designation as a
736 Gold Seal Quality Care provider, a child care facility, large
737 family child care home, or family day care home must meet the
738 following additional criteria:
739 (a) The child care provider must not have had any class I
740 violations, as defined by rule of the Department of Children and
741 Families, for which the Department of Children and Families
742 determines that the child care provider is the primary cause of
743 the violation within the 2 years preceding its application for
744 designation as a Gold Seal Quality Care provider. Commission of
745 a class I violation for which the Department of Children and
746 Families determines that the child care provider is the primary
747 cause of the violation shall be grounds for termination of the
748 designation as a Gold Seal Quality Care provider until the
749 provider has no class I violations for a period of 2 years.
750 (d) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), if the Department of
Page 30 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
751 Education determines through a formal process that a provider
752 has been in business for at least 5 years and has no other class
753 I violations recorded, the department may recommend to the state
754 board that the provider maintain its Gold Seal Quality Care
755 status. The state board's determination regarding such
756 provider's status is final.
757 Section 17. Subsection (2) of section 1003.25, Florida
758 Statutes, is amended to read:
759 1003.25 Procedures for maintenance and transfer of student
760 records.—
761 (2) The procedure for transferring and maintaining records
762 of students who transfer from school to school is prescribed by
763 rules of the State Board of Education. The transfer of records
764 must occur within 5 school days. The records must include, if
765 applicable:
766 (a) Verified reports of serious or recurrent behavior
767 patterns, including any threat assessment report, all
768 corresponding documentation, and any other information required
769 by the Florida-specific behavioral threat assessment instrument
770 pursuant to s. 1001.212(11) which contains the evaluation,
771 intervention, and management of the threat assessment
772 evaluations and intervention services. Upon enrollment of the
773 student, the school resource officer shall be notified and
774 provided access to such records upon request.
775 (b) Psychological evaluations, including therapeutic
Page 31 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
776 treatment plans and therapy or progress notes created or
777 maintained by school district or charter school staff, as
778 appropriate.
779 Section 18. Subsection (6) is added to section 1003.26,
780 Florida Statutes, to read:
781 1003.26 Enforcement of school attendance.—The Legislature
782 finds that poor academic performance is associated with
783 nonattendance and that school districts must take an active role
784 in promoting and enforcing attendance as a means of improving
785 student performance. It is the policy of the state that each
786 district school superintendent be responsible for enforcing
787 school attendance of all students subject to the compulsory
788 school age in the school district and supporting enforcement of
789 school attendance by local law enforcement agencies. The
790 responsibility includes recommending policies and procedures to
791 the district school board that require public schools to respond
792 in a timely manner to every unexcused absence, and every absence
793 for which the reason is unknown, of students enrolled in the
794 schools. District school board policies shall require the parent
795 of a student to justify each absence of the student, and that
796 justification will be evaluated based on adopted district school
797 board policies that define excused and unexcused absences. The
798 policies must provide that public schools track excused and
799 unexcused absences and contact the home in the case of an
800 unexcused absence from school, or an absence from school for
Page 32 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
801 which the reason is unknown, to prevent the development of
802 patterns of nonattendance. The Legislature finds that early
803 intervention in school attendance is the most effective way of
804 producing good attendance habits that will lead to improved
805 student learning and achievement. Each public school is required
806 to implement the following steps to promote and enforce regular
807 school attendance:
808 (6) Nothing in this subsection prohibits a school district
809 from addressing patterns of nonattendance earlier than
810 prescribed in this section.
811 Section 19. Paragraph (o) of subsection (2) and subsection
812 (5) of section 1003.42, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
813 1003.42 Required instruction.—
814 (2) Members of the instructional staff of the public
815 schools, subject to the rules of the State Board of Education
816 and the district school board, shall teach efficiently and
817 faithfully, using the books and materials required that meet the
818 highest standards for professionalism and historical accuracy,
819 following the prescribed courses of study, and employing
820 approved methods of instruction, the following:
821 (o) Comprehensive age-appropriate and developmentally
822 appropriate K-12 instruction on:
823 1. Health education that addresses concepts of community
824 health, consumer health, environmental health, and family life,
825 including:
Page 33 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
826 a. Injury prevention and safety.
827 b. Internet safety.
828 c. Nutrition.
829 d. Personal health.
830 e. Prevention and control of disease.
831 f. Substance use and abuse.
832 g. Prevention of child sexual abuse, exploitation, and
833 human trafficking.
834 h. Human embryologic and fetal development.
835 2. For students in grades 7 through 12, teen dating
836 violence and abuse. This component must include, but not be
837 limited to, the definition of dating violence and abuse, the
838 warning signs of dating violence and abusive behavior, the
839 characteristics of healthy relationships, measures to prevent
840 and stop dating violence and abuse, and community resources
841 available to victims of dating violence and abuse.
842 3. For students in grades 6 through 12, awareness of the
843 benefits of sexual abstinence as the expected standard and the
844 consequences of teenage pregnancy.
845 4. Life skills that build confidence, support mental and
846 emotional health, and enable students to overcome challenges,
847 including:
848 a. Self-awareness and self-management.
849 b. Responsible decisionmaking.
850 c. Resiliency.
Page 34 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
851 d. Relationship skills and conflict resolution.
852 e. Understanding and respecting other viewpoints and
853 backgrounds.
854 f. For grades 9 through 12, developing leadership skills,
855 interpersonal skills, organization skills, and research skills;
856 creating a résumé, including a digital résumé; exploring career
857 pathways; using state career planning resources; developing and
858 practicing the skills necessary for employment interviews;
859 workplace ethics and workplace law; managing stress and
860 expectations; and self-motivation.
861 5.a. For students in grades 6 through 12, the social,
862 emotional, and physical effects of social media. This component
863 must include, but need not be limited to, the negative effects
864 of social media on mental health, including addiction; the
865 distribution of misinformation on social media; how social media
866 manipulates behavior; the permanency of sharing materials
867 online; how to maintain personal security and identify
868 cyberbullying, predatory behavior, and human trafficking on the
869 Internet; and how to report suspicious behavior encountered on
870 the Internet.
871 b. The Department of Education shall make available online
872 the instructional material being used pursuant to this
873 subparagraph, and each district school board shall notify
874 parents of its availability.
875 6.a. For students in grades 6 through 12, health education
Page 35 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
876 addressing human embryologic and fetal development must include
877 all of the following:
878 (I) A high-definition, medically accurate ultrasound
879 video, at least 1 minute in duration, showing the development of
880 the heart and other organs and movement of the limbs and head.
881 (II) A high-quality, medically accurate, computer-
882 generated rendering, animation, video, or other multimedia, at
883 least 3 minutes in duration, showing and describing the process
884 of fertilization and various stages of human development inside
885 the uterus, noting significant markers in cell growth and organ
886 development by week from conception until birth.
887 b. The State Board of Education may adopt rules to
888 implement this subparagraph.
889
890 Health education and life skills instruction and materials may
891 not contradict the principles enumerated in subsection (3).
892
893 The State Board of Education is encouraged to adopt standards
894 and pursue assessment of the requirements of this subsection.
895 Instructional programming that incorporates the values of the
896 recipients of the Congressional Medal of Honor and that is
897 offered as part of a social studies, English Language Arts, or
898 other schoolwide character building and veteran awareness
899 initiative meets the requirements of paragraph (u).
900 (5) Each school shall provide a notification to parents
Page 36 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
901 relating to a parent's right to make a Any student whose parent
902 makes written request to the school principal for his or her
903 student to shall be exempted from the teaching of reproductive
904 health or any disease, including HIV/AIDS, its symptoms,
905 development, and treatment or the teaching of human embryologic
906 and fetal development under subparagraph (o)6. A student so
907 exempted may not be penalized by reason of that exemption.
908 Course descriptions for comprehensive health education may shall
909 not interfere with the local determination of appropriate
910 curriculum which reflects local values and concerns. Each school
911 district shall, on the district's website homepage, notify
912 parents of this right and the process to request an exemption.
913 The home page must include a link for a student's parent to
914 access and review the instructional materials, as defined in s.
915 1006.29(2), used to teach the curriculum.
916 Section 20. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
917 1003.4201, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
918 1003.4201 Comprehensive system of reading instruction.—
919 Each school district must implement a system of comprehensive
920 reading instruction for students enrolled in prekindergarten
921 through grade 12 and certain students who exhibit a substantial
922 deficiency in early literacy.
923 (2)(a) Components of the reading instruction plan may
924 include the following:
925 1. Additional time per day of evidence-based intensive
Page 37 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
926 reading instruction for kindergarten through grade 12 students,
927 which may be delivered during or outside of the regular school
928 day.
929 2. A description of how highly qualified reading coaches,
930 who must be endorsed in reading, will be deployed to
931 specifically support classroom teachers in making instructional
932 decisions based on progress monitoring data collected pursuant
933 to s. 1008.25(9) and improve classroom teacher delivery of
934 effective reading instruction, reading intervention, and reading
935 in the content areas based on student need.
936 3. Professional learning to help instructional personnel
937 and certified prekindergarten teachers funded in the Florida
938 Education Finance Program earn a certification, a credential, an
939 endorsement, or an advanced degree in scientifically researched
940 and evidence-based reading instruction.
941 4. Summer reading camps, using only classroom teachers or
942 other district personnel who possess a micro-credential as
943 specified in s. 1003.485 or are certified or endorsed in reading
944 consistent with s. 1008.25(8)(b)3., for all students in
945 kindergarten through grade 5 exhibiting a reading deficiency as
946 determined by district and state assessments.
947 5. Intensive reading interventions, which must be
948 delivered by instructional personnel who possess a micro-
949 credential as defined in s. 1003.485(1) or are certified or
950 endorsed in reading as provided in s. 1012.586 and must
Page 38 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
951 incorporate evidence-based strategies identified by the Just
952 Read, Florida! office pursuant to s. 1001.215(7). Instructional
953 personnel who possess a micro-credential as defined in s.
954 1003.485(1) and are delivering intensive reading interventions
955 must be supervised by an individual certified or endorsed in
956 reading. For the purposes of this subparagraph, the term
957 "supervised" means that instructional personnel with a micro-
958 credential are able, through telecommunication or in person, to
959 communicate and consult with, and receive direction from,
960 certified or endorsed personnel. Incentives for instructional
961 personnel and certified prekindergarten teachers funded in the
962 Florida Education Finance Program who possess a reading
963 certification or endorsement as specified in s. 1012.586 or
964 micro-credential as specified in s. 1003.485 and provide
965 educational support to improve student literacy.
966 6. Tutoring in reading.
967 7. A description of how the district prioritizes the
968 assignment of highly effective teachers, as identified in s.
969 1012.34(2)(e), from kindergarten to grade 2.
970 8. Providing resources that support informed parent
971 involvement in decisionmaking processes for students who have
972 difficulty in reading and for parents of students who are
973 reading below grade level, information about the students'
974 eligibility for the New Worlds Reading Initiative under s.
975 1003.485.
Page 39 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
976 Section 21. Section 1003.4202, Florida Statutes, is
977 created to read:
978 1003.4202 Comprehensive system of mathematics
979 instruction.—Each school district must implement a system of
980 comprehensive mathematics instruction for students enrolled in
981 prekindergarten through grade 12 and certain students who
982 exhibit a substantial deficiency in early mathematics skills
983 under s. 1008.25(6).
984 (1) Each school district must develop, and submit to the
985 district school board for approval, a detailed mathematics
986 instruction plan that outlines the components of the district's
987 comprehensive system of mathematics instruction. The plan must
988 include all district schools, including charter schools, unless
989 a charter school elects to submit a plan independently from the
990 school district. A charter school plan must comply with all of
991 the provisions of this section and must be approved by the
992 charter school's governing body and provided to the charter
993 school's sponsor.
994 (2) Components of the mathematics instruction plan may
995 include the following:
996 (a) Additional time per day of evidence-based intensive
997 mathematics instruction for kindergarten through grade 12
998 students, which may be delivered during or outside of the
999 regular school day.
1000 (b) Employing highly qualified mathematics coaches to
Page 40 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1001 specifically support classroom teachers in making instructional
1002 decisions based on progress monitoring data collected pursuant
1003 to s. 1008.25(9) and improve classroom teacher delivery of
1004 effective mathematics instruction and mathematics intervention.
1005 The coaches must:
1006 1. Hold either a grades 5 through 9 mathematics
1007 certification or a grades 6 through 12 mathematics certification
1008 that aligns with the certification requirements for the courses
1009 of the teachers they support.
1010 2. Have earned a highly effective rating on the 3 prior
1011 years' performance evaluation under s. 1012.34.
1012 (c) Tutoring in mathematics.
1013 (3) Each school district shall submit its approved
1014 mathematics instruction plan, including approved mathematics
1015 instruction plans for each charter school in the district, to
1016 the school board and, if applicable, any charter school
1017 governing board by August 1 of each fiscal year.
1018 (4) For purposes of this section, the term "evidence-
1019 based" means demonstrating a statistically significant effect on
1020 improving student outcomes or other relevant outcomes as
1021 provided in 20 U.S.C. s. 8101(21)(A)(i).
1022 Section 22. Subsection (1) of section 1003.46, Florida
1023 Statutes, is amended to read:
1024 1003.46 Health education; instruction in acquired immune
1025 deficiency syndrome.—
Page 41 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1026 (1) Each district school board may provide instruction in
1027 acquired immune deficiency syndrome education as a specific area
1028 of health education. Such instruction may include, but is not
1029 limited to, the known modes of transmission, signs and symptoms,
1030 risk factors associated with acquired immune deficiency
1031 syndrome, and means used to control the spread of acquired
1032 immune deficiency syndrome. The instruction shall be appropriate
1033 for the grade and age of the student and shall reflect current
1034 theory, knowledge, and practice regarding acquired immune
1035 deficiency syndrome and its prevention. The parent of a student
1036 may make a written request for his or her student to be exempted
1037 from such instruction.
1038 Section 23. Paragraph (f) of subsection (6) of section
1039 1006.07, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1040 1006.07 District school board duties relating to student
1041 discipline and school safety.—The district school board shall
1042 provide for the proper accounting for all students, for the
1043 attendance and control of students at school, and for proper
1044 attention to health, safety, and other matters relating to the
1045 welfare of students, including:
1046 (6) SAFETY AND SECURITY BEST PRACTICES.—Each district
1047 school superintendent shall establish policies and procedures
1048 for the prevention of violence on school grounds, including the
1049 assessment of and intervention with individuals whose behavior
1050 poses a threat to the safety of the school community.
Page 42 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1051 (f) School safety requirements.—Each school district and
1052 charter school governing board shall comply with the following
1053 school safety requirements, which apply from 30 minutes before
1054 the school start time until 30 minutes after the end of the
1055 school day:
1056 1. All gates or other access points that restrict ingress
1057 to or egress from the exclusive zone of a school campus shall
1058 remain closed and locked when students are on campus. For the
1059 purposes of this section, the term "exclusive zone" means the
1060 area within a gate or door allowing access to the interior
1061 perimeter of a school campus beyond a single point of entry. A
1062 gate or access point to the exclusive zone may only be open or
1063 unlocked if one of the following conditions is met:
1064 a. It is attended or actively staffed when students are on
1065 campus;
1066 b. The use complies with a shared use agreement pursuant
1067 to s. 1013.101;
1068 c. Another closed and locked gate or access point
1069 separates the open or unlocked gate from areas occupied by
1070 students; or
1071 d. The school safety specialist, or his or her designee,
1072 has documented in the Florida Safe Schools Assessment Tool
1073 portal maintained by the Office of Safe Schools that the gate or
1074 other access point is not subject to this requirement based upon
1075 other safety measures at the school. The office may conduct a
Page 43 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1076 compliance visit pursuant to s. 1001.212(13) to review if such
1077 determination is appropriate.
1078
1079 This subparagraph does not apply to the nonexclusive zone of a
1080 school campus. The term "nonexclusive zone" means the area
1081 outside of the exclusive zone but contained on school property.
1082 Nonexclusive zones may include, but are not limited to, such
1083 spaces as parking lots, athletic fields and stadiums, mechanical
1084 buildings, playgrounds, bus ramps, agricultural spaces, and
1085 other areas that do not give direct, unimpeded access to the
1086 exclusive zone.
1087 2.a. All school classrooms and other instructional spaces
1088 must be locked to prevent ingress when occupied by students,
1089 except between class periods when students are moving between
1090 classrooms or other instructional spaces. If a classroom or
1091 other instructional space door must be left unlocked or open for
1092 any reason other than between class periods when students are
1093 moving between classrooms or other instructional spaces, the
1094 door must be actively staffed by a person standing or seated at
1095 the door. All school classrooms and other instructional spaces
1096 with a permanently installed door lock may also use temporary
1097 door locks during an active assailant incident. The temporary
1098 door lock must be able to be engaged or removed without opening
1099 the door; must be easily removed in a single operation from the
1100 egress side of the door without the use of a key and from the
Page 44 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1101 ingress side of the door with the use of a key or other
1102 credential; may be installed at any height; must otherwise be in
1103 compliance with the Florida Fire Prevention Code; and must be
1104 integrated into the active assailant response plan.
1105 b. Instructional spaces for career and technical education
1106 which are designed as open areas for which compliance with the
1107 requirements of sub-subparagraph a. affects the health and
1108 safety of students may be exempted from compliance with that
1109 sub-subparagraph by the school safety specialist. To be exempt,
1110 the school safety specialist, or his or her designee, must
1111 document in the Florida Safe Schools Assessment Tool portal
1112 maintained by the Office of Safe Schools that the instructional
1113 space is exempt from these requirements due to negative impacts
1114 to student health and safety and the presence of other safety
1115 measures at the school that prevent egress from the
1116 instructional space to hallways or other classrooms or
1117 instructional spaces.
1118 c. Common areas on a school campus, including, but not
1119 limited to, cafeterias, auditoriums, and media centers, which
1120 are used for instructional time or student testing must meet the
1121 requirements of sub-subparagraph a. only when such areas are
1122 being used for instructional time or student testing.
1123 3. For schools that do not have a secure exclusive zone,
1124 all campus access doors, gates, and other access points that
1125 allow ingress to or egress from a school building shall remain
Page 45 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1126 closed and locked at all times to prevent ingress, unless:
1127 a. A person is actively entering or exiting the door,
1128 gate, or other access point;
1129 b. The door, gate, or access point is actively staffed by
1130 school personnel to prevent unauthorized entry; or
1131 c. The school safety specialist, or his or her designee,
1132 has documented in the Florida Safe Schools Assessment Tool
1133 portal maintained by the Office of Safe Schools that the open
1134 and unlocked door, gate, or other access point is not subject to
1135 this requirement based upon other safety measures at the school.
1136 There must be at least one locked barrier between classrooms and
1137 instructional spaces and open school campus.
1138
1139 The office may conduct a compliance visit pursuant to s.
1140 1001.212(13) to review if such determination is appropriate. All
1141 campus access doors, gates, and other access points may be
1142 electronically or manually controlled by school personnel to
1143 allow access by authorized visitors, students, and school
1144 personnel.
1145 4. All school classrooms and other instructional spaces
1146 must clearly and conspicuously mark the safest areas in each
1147 classroom or other instructional space where students must
1148 shelter in place during an emergency. Students must be notified
1149 of these safe areas within the first 10 days of the school year.
1150 If it is not feasible to clearly and conspicuously mark the
Page 46 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1151 safest areas in a classroom or other instructional space, the
1152 school safety specialist, or his or her designee, must document
1153 such determination in the Florida Safe Schools Assessment Tool
1154 portal maintained by the Office of Safe Schools, identifying
1155 where affected students must shelter in place. The office shall
1156 assist the school safety specialist with compliance during the
1157 inspection required under s. 1001.212(13).
1158
1159 Persons who are aware of a violation of this paragraph must
1160 report the violation to the school principal. The school
1161 principal must report the violation to the school safety
1162 specialist no later than the next business day after receiving
1163 such report. If the person who violated this paragraph is the
1164 school principal or charter school administrator, the report
1165 must be made directly to the district school superintendent or
1166 charter school governing board, as applicable.
1167 Section 24. Section 1006.12, Florida Statutes, is amended
1168 to read:
1169 1006.12 Safe-school officers at each public school.—For
1170 the protection and safety of school personnel, property,
1171 students, and visitors, each district school board and school
1172 district superintendent shall partner with law enforcement
1173 agencies or security agencies to establish or assign one or more
1174 safe-school officers at each school facility within the
1175 district, including charter schools. A district school board
Page 47 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1176 must collaborate with charter school governing boards to
1177 facilitate charter school access to all safe-school officer
1178 options available under this section. Notwithstanding any local
1179 ordinance or development order, the school district or charter
1180 school may implement any combination of the options in
1181 subsections (1)-(4) to best meet the needs of the school
1182 district and charter schools.
1183 (1) SCHOOL RESOURCE OFFICER.—A school district may
1184 establish school resource officer programs through a cooperative
1185 agreement with law enforcement agencies.
1186 (a) School resource officers shall undergo criminal
1187 background checks, drug testing, and a psychological evaluation
1188 and be certified law enforcement officers, as defined in s.
1189 943.10(1), who are employed by a law enforcement agency as
1190 defined in s. 943.10(4). The powers and duties of a law
1191 enforcement officer shall continue throughout the employee's
1192 tenure as a school resource officer.
1193 (b) School resource officers shall abide by district
1194 school board policies and shall consult with and coordinate
1195 activities through the school principal, but shall be
1196 responsible to the law enforcement agency in all matters
1197 relating to employment, subject to agreements between a district
1198 school board and a law enforcement agency. The agreements shall
1199 identify the entity responsible for maintaining records relating
1200 to training. Activities conducted by the school resource officer
Page 48 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1201 which are part of the regular instructional program of the
1202 school shall be under the direction of the school principal.
1203 (2) SCHOOL SAFETY OFFICER.—A school district may
1204 commission one or more school safety officers for the protection
1205 and safety of school personnel, property, and students within
1206 the school district. The district school superintendent may
1207 recommend, and the district school board may appoint, one or
1208 more school safety officers.
1209 (a) School safety officers shall undergo criminal
1210 background checks, drug testing, and a psychological evaluation
1211 and be law enforcement officers, as defined in s. 943.10(1),
1212 certified under chapter 943 and employed by either a law
1213 enforcement agency or by the district school board. If the
1214 officer is employed by the district school board, the district
1215 school board is the employing agency for purposes of chapter
1216 943, and must comply with that chapter.
1217 (b) A school safety officer has and shall exercise the
1218 power to make arrests for violations of law on district school
1219 board property or on property owned or leased by a charter
1220 school under a charter contract, as applicable, and to arrest
1221 persons, whether on or off such property, who violate any law on
1222 such property under the same conditions that deputy sheriffs are
1223 authorized to make arrests. A school safety officer has the
1224 authority to carry weapons when performing his or her official
1225 duties.
Page 49 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1226 (c) School safety officers must complete mental health
1227 crisis intervention training using a curriculum developed by a
1228 national organization with expertise in mental health crisis
1229 intervention. The training shall improve officers' knowledge and
1230 skills as first responders to incidents involving students with
1231 emotional disturbance or mental illness, including de-escalation
1232 skills to ensure student and officer safety.
1233 (d) A district school board may enter into mutual aid
1234 agreements with one or more law enforcement agencies as provided
1235 in chapter 23. A school safety officer's salary may be paid
1236 jointly by the district school board and the law enforcement
1237 agency, as mutually agreed to.
1238 (3) SCHOOL GUARDIAN.—
1239 (a) At the school district's or the charter school
1240 governing board's discretion, as applicable, pursuant to s.
1241 30.15, a school district or charter school governing board may
1242 participate in the Chris Hixon, Coach Aaron Feis, and Coach
1243 Scott Beigel Guardian Program to meet the requirement of
1244 establishing a safe-school officer. The following individuals
1245 may serve as a school guardian, in support of school-sanctioned
1246 activities for purposes of s. 790.115, upon satisfactory
1247 completion of the requirements under s. 30.15(1)(k) and
1248 certification by a sheriff:
1249 1. A school district employee or personnel, as defined
1250 under s. 1012.01, or a charter school employee, as provided
Page 50 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1251 under s. 1002.33(12)(a), who volunteers to serve as a school
1252 guardian in addition to his or her official job duties; or
1253 2. An employee of a school district or a charter school
1254 who is hired for the specific purpose of serving as a school
1255 guardian.
1256 (b) Before appointing an individual as a school guardian,
1257 the school district or charter school shall contact the
1258 Department of Law Enforcement and review all information
1259 maintained under s. 30.15(1)(k)3.c. related to the individual.
1260 (c) The department shall provide to the Department of Law
1261 Enforcement any information relating to a school guardian
1262 received pursuant to subsection (5).
1263 (4) SCHOOL SECURITY GUARD.—A school district or charter
1264 school governing board may contract with a security agency as
1265 defined in s. 493.6101(18) to employ as a school security guard
1266 an individual who holds a Class "D" and Class "G" license
1267 pursuant to chapter 493, provided the following training and
1268 contractual conditions are met:
1269 (a) An individual who serves as a school security guard,
1270 for purposes of satisfying the requirements of this section,
1271 must:
1272 1. Demonstrate completion of 144 hours of required
1273 training conducted by a sheriff pursuant to s. 30.15(1)(k)2.
1274 2. Pass a psychological evaluation administered by a
1275 psychologist licensed under chapter 490 and designated by the
Page 51 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1276 Department of Law Enforcement and submit the results of the
1277 evaluation to the sheriff's office and school district, charter
1278 school governing board, or employing security agency, as
1279 applicable. The Department of Law Enforcement is authorized to
1280 provide the sheriff's office, school district, charter school
1281 governing board, or employing security agency with mental health
1282 and substance abuse data for compliance with this paragraph.
1283 3. Submit to and pass an initial drug test and subsequent
1284 random drug tests in accordance with the requirements of s.
1285 112.0455 and the sheriff's office, school district, charter
1286 school governing board, or employing security agency, as
1287 applicable.
1288 4. Be approved to work as a school security guard by the
1289 sheriff of each county in which the school security guard will
1290 be assigned to a school before commencing work at any school in
1291 that county. The sheriff's approval authorizes the security
1292 agency to assign the school security guard to any school in the
1293 county, and the sheriff's approval is not limited to any
1294 particular school.
1295 5. Successfully complete ongoing training, weapon
1296 inspection, and firearm qualification conducted by a sheriff
1297 pursuant to s. 30.15(1)(k)2.e. on at least an annual basis and
1298 provide documentation to the sheriff's office, school district,
1299 charter school governing board, or employing security agency, as
1300 applicable.
Page 52 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1301 (b) The contract between a security agency and a school
1302 district or a charter school governing board regarding
1303 requirements applicable to school security guards serving in the
1304 capacity of a safe-school officer for purposes of satisfying the
1305 requirements of this section shall define the entity or entities
1306 responsible for maintaining records relating to training,
1307 inspection, and firearm qualification.
1308 (c) School security guards serving in the capacity of a
1309 safe-school officer pursuant to this subsection are in support
1310 of school-sanctioned activities for purposes of s. 790.115, and
1311 must aid in the prevention or abatement of active assailant
1312 incidents on school premises.
1313 (d) The Office of Safe Schools shall provide the
1314 Department of Law Enforcement any information related to a
1315 school security guard that the office receives pursuant to
1316 subsection (5).
1317 (5) NOTIFICATION.—The district school superintendent or
1318 charter school administrator, or a respective designee shall
1319 notify the county sheriff and the Office of Safe Schools
1320 immediately after, but no later than 72 hours after:
1321 (a) A safe-school officer is dismissed for misconduct or
1322 is otherwise disciplined.
1323 (b) A safe-school officer discharges his or her firearm in
1324 the exercise of the safe-school officer's duties, other than for
1325 training purposes.
Page 53 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1326 (6) CRISIS INTERVENTION TRAINING.—Each safe-school officer
1327 who is also a sworn law enforcement officer shall complete
1328 mental health crisis intervention training using a curriculum
1329 developed by a national organization with expertise in mental
1330 health crisis intervention. The training must improve the
1331 officer's knowledge and skills as a first responder to incidents
1332 involving students with emotional disturbance or mental illness,
1333 including de-escalation skills to ensure student and officer
1334 safety.
1335 (7) LIMITATIONS.—An individual must satisfy the background
1336 screening, psychological evaluation, and drug test requirements
1337 and be approved by the sheriff before participating in any
1338 training required by s. 30.15(1)(k), which may be conducted only
1339 by a sheriff.
1340 (8) EXEMPTION.—Any information that would identify whether
1341 a particular individual has been appointed as a safe-school
1342 officer pursuant to this section held by a law enforcement
1343 agency, school district, or charter school is exempt from s.
1344 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
1345
1346 If a district school board, through its adopted policies,
1347 procedures, or actions, denies a charter school access to any
1348 safe-school officer options pursuant to this section, the school
1349 district must assign a school resource officer or school safety
1350 officer to the charter school. Under such circumstances, the
Page 54 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1351 charter school's share of the costs of the school resource
1352 officer or school safety officer may not exceed the safe school
1353 allocation funds provided to the charter school pursuant to s.
1354 1011.62(12) and shall be retained by the school district.
1355 Section 25. Paragraph (a) of subsection (6) of section
1356 1006.20, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1357 1006.20 Athletics in public K-12 schools.—
1358 (6) PUBLIC LIAISON ADVISORY COMMITTEE.—
1359 (a) The FHSAA shall establish, sustain, fund, and provide
1360 staff support to a public liaison advisory committee composed of
1361 the following:
1362 1. The commissioner or his or her designee.
1363 2. A member public school principal.
1364 3. A member private school principal.
1365 4. A member school principal who is a former high school
1366 athlete or high school coach member of a racial minority.
1367 5. An active athletic director.
1368 6. An active coach, who is employed full time by a member
1369 school.
1370 7. A student athlete.
1371 8. A district school superintendent.
1372 9. A district school board member.
1373 10. A member of the Florida House of Representatives.
1374 11. A member of the Florida Senate.
1375 12. A parent of a high school student.
Page 55 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1376 13. A member of a home education association.
1377 14. A representative of the business community.
1378 15. A representative of the news media.
1379 Section 26. Subsection (17) of section 1006.38, Florida
1380 Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (18), and a new subsection
1381 (17) is added to that section, to read:
1382 1006.38 Duties, responsibilities, and requirements of
1383 instructional materials publishers and manufacturers.—This
1384 section applies to both the state and district approval
1385 processes. Publishers and manufacturers of instructional
1386 materials, or their representatives, shall:
1387 (17) If, after state adoption, the commissioner determines
1388 that a publisher or manufacturer has violated any provision of
1389 general law relating to the content, marketing, sale,
1390 distribution, or furnishing of instructional materials, or any
1391 requirement of this part, the department shall provide written
1392 notice identifying the alleged violation.
1393 (a) The publisher of noncompliant materials shall have at
1394 least 30 calendar days to submit a written response and any
1395 proposed corrective action, which may include providing revised
1396 or replacement materials at no cost to the state or school
1397 districts.
1398 (b) If the publisher has not rectified the violation
1399 within the timeframe established in this subsection, the
1400 commissioner shall report the violation to the State Board of
Page 56 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1401 Education. The State Board of Education shall have the authority
1402 to:
1403 1. Remove all of the noncompliant materials from the
1404 state-adopted list.
1405 2. Require the publisher to reimburse the total cost of
1406 all purchased materials with the identified noncompliance to
1407 each school district that purchased the materials from the
1408 publisher.
1409 3. Prohibit the publisher from bidding on instructional
1410 materials for the subject area in which the violation occurred
1411 for state adoption for a period not to exceed 5 years.
1412 (c) The decision of the State Board of Education
1413 constitutes final agency action subject to judicial review as
1414 provided by law. A publisher or manufacturer aggrieved by a
1415 final action of the State Board of Education may appeal the
1416 decision pursuant to the Administrative Procedures Act within 30
1417 days after issuance of the final action.
1418 (d) Action taken under this subsection is in addition to,
1419 and does not limit, any other remedies available under this
1420 part, including removal of materials under s. 1006.35(3) and
1421 penalties under subsection (18).
1422 Section 27. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
1423 1008.2125, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1424 1008.2125 The Council for Early Grade Success.—
1425 (1) The Council for Early Grade Success, a council as
Page 57 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1426 defined in s. 20.03(7), is created within the Department of
1427 Education to oversee the coordinated screening and progress
1428 monitoring program under s. 1008.25(9) for students in the
1429 Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program through grade 3 and,
1430 except as otherwise provided in this section, shall operate
1431 consistent with s. 20.052.
1432 (a) The council shall be responsible for reviewing the
1433 implementation of, training for, and outcomes from the
1434 coordinated screening and progress monitoring program to provide
1435 recommendations to the department that support grade 3 students
1436 reading at or above grade level. The council, at a minimum,
1437 shall:
1438 1. Provide recommendations on the implementation of the
1439 coordinated screening and progress monitoring program, including
1440 reviewing any procurement solicitation documents and criteria
1441 before being published.
1442 2. Develop training plans and timelines for such training.
1443 3. Identify appropriate personnel, processes, and
1444 procedures required for the administration of the coordinated
1445 screening and progress monitoring program.
1446 4. Provide input on the methodology for calculating a
1447 provider's or school's performance metric and designations under
1448 s. 1002.68(3) s. 1002.68(4).
1449 5. Work with the department to review the methodology for
1450 determining a child's kindergarten readiness.
Page 58 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1451 6. Review data on age-appropriate learning gains by grade
1452 level that a student would need to attain in order to
1453 demonstrate proficiency in reading by grade 3.
1454 7. Continually review anonymized data from the results of
1455 the coordinated screening and progress monitoring program for
1456 students in the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program
1457 through grade 3 to help inform recommendations to the department
1458 that support practices that will enable grade 3 students to read
1459 at or above grade level.
1460 Section 28. Paragraph (c) of subsection (4), paragraphs
1461 (b) and (d) of subsection (5), paragraph (a) of subsection (9),
1462 and paragraph (b) of subsection (10) of section 1008.25, Florida
1463 Statutes, are amended to read:
1464 1008.25 Public school student progression; student
1465 support; coordinated screening and progress monitoring;
1466 reporting requirements.—
1467 (4) ASSESSMENT AND SUPPORT.—
1468 (c) A student who has a substantial reading deficiency as
1469 determined in paragraph (5)(a) or a substantial mathematics
1470 deficiency as determined in paragraph (6)(a) must be covered by
1471 a federally required student plan, such as an individual
1472 education plan or an individualized progress monitoring plan, or
1473 both, as necessary. The individualized progress monitoring plan
1474 must be developed within 30 45 days after the results of the
1475 coordinated screening and progress monitoring system become
Page 59 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1476 available. The plan must, at a minimum, include:
1477 1. The student's specific, identified reading or
1478 mathematics skill deficiency.
1479 2. Goals and benchmarks for student growth in reading or
1480 mathematics.
1481 3. A description of the specific measures that will be
1482 used to evaluate and monitor the student's reading or
1483 mathematics progress.
1484 4. For a substantial reading deficiency, the specific
1485 evidence-based literacy instruction grounded in the science of
1486 reading which the student will receive.
1487 5. Strategies, resources, and materials that will be
1488 provided to the student's parent to support the student to make
1489 reading or mathematics progress. Resources must include
1490 information about the student's eligibility for the New Worlds
1491 Reading Initiative under s. 1003.485.
1492 6. Any additional services the student's teacher deems
1493 available and appropriate to accelerate the student's reading or
1494 mathematics skill development.
1495 (5) READING DEFICIENCY AND PARENTAL NOTIFICATION.—
1496 (b) A Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program student
1497 who exhibits a substantial deficiency in early literacy skills
1498 based upon the results of the administration of the midyear or
1499 final coordinated screening and progress monitoring under
1500 subsection (9) shall be referred to the local school district
Page 60 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1501 and may be eligible to receive instruction in early literacy
1502 skills before participating in kindergarten. A Voluntary
1503 Prekindergarten Education Program student who scores below the
1504 25th 10th percentile on the final administration of the
1505 coordinated screening and progress monitoring under subsection
1506 (9) shall be referred to the local school district and is
1507 eligible to receive early literacy skill instructional support
1508 through a summer bridge program the summer before participating
1509 in kindergarten. The summer bridge program must meet
1510 requirements adopted by the department and shall consist of 4
1511 hours of instruction per day for a minimum of 100 total hours. A
1512 student with an individual education plan who has been retained
1513 pursuant to paragraph (2)(g) and has demonstrated a substantial
1514 deficiency in early literacy skills must receive instruction in
1515 early literacy skills.
1516 (d) The parent of any student who exhibits a substantial
1517 deficiency in reading, as described in paragraph (a), must be
1518 immediately notified in writing of the following:
1519 1. That his or her child has been identified as having a
1520 substantial deficiency in reading, including a description and
1521 explanation, in terms understandable to the parent, of the exact
1522 nature of the student's difficulty in learning and lack of
1523 achievement in reading.
1524 2. A description of the current services that are provided
1525 to the child.
Page 61 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1526 3. A description of the proposed intensive interventions
1527 and supports that will be provided to the child that are
1528 designed to remediate the identified area of reading deficiency.
1529 4. The student progression requirements under paragraph
1530 (2)(h) and that if the child's reading deficiency is not
1531 remediated by the end of grade 3, the child must be retained
1532 unless he or she is exempt from mandatory retention for good
1533 cause.
1534 5. Strategies, including multisensory strategies and
1535 programming, through a read-at-home plan the parent can use in
1536 helping his or her child succeed in reading. The read-at-home
1537 plan must provide access to the resources identified in
1538 paragraph (e).
1539 6. That the statewide, standardized English Language Arts
1540 assessment is not the sole determiner of promotion and that
1541 additional evaluations, portfolio reviews, and assessments are
1542 available to the child to assist parents and the school district
1543 in knowing when a child is reading at or above grade level and
1544 ready for grade promotion.
1545 7. The district's specific criteria and policies for a
1546 portfolio as provided in subparagraph (7)(b)4. and the evidence
1547 required for a student to demonstrate mastery of Florida's
1548 academic standards for English Language Arts. A school must
1549 immediately begin collecting evidence for a portfolio when a
1550 student in grade 3 is identified as being at risk of retention
Page 62 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1551 or upon the request of the parent, whichever occurs first.
1552 8. The district's specific criteria and policies for
1553 midyear promotion. Midyear promotion means promotion of a
1554 retained student at any time during the year of retention once
1555 the student has demonstrated ability to read at grade level.
1556 9. Information about the student's eligibility for the New
1557 Worlds Reading Initiative under s. 1003.485 and the New Worlds
1558 Scholarship Accounts under s. 1002.411 and information on parent
1559 training modules and other reading engagement resources
1560 available through the initiative.
1561
1562 After initial notification, the school shall apprise the parent
1563 at least monthly of the student's progress in response to the
1564 intensive interventions and supports and information about the
1565 student's eligibility for the New Worlds Reading Initiative
1566 under s. 1003.485. Such communications must be in writing and
1567 must explain any additional interventions or supports that will
1568 be implemented to accelerate the student's progress if the
1569 interventions and supports already being implemented have not
1570 resulted in improvement. Upon the request of the parent, the
1571 teacher or school administrator shall meet to discuss the
1572 student's progress. The parent may request more frequent
1573 notification of the student's progress, more frequent
1574 interventions or supports, and earlier implementation of the
1575 additional interventions or supports described in the initial
Page 63 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1576 notification.
1577 (9) COORDINATED SCREENING AND PROGRESS MONITORING SYSTEM.—
1578 (a) The Department of Education, in collaboration with the
1579 Office of Early Learning, shall procure and require the use of a
1580 statewide, standardized coordinated screening and progress
1581 monitoring system for the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education
1582 Program and public schools. The system must:
1583 1. Measure student progress in meeting the appropriate
1584 expectations in early literacy and mathematics skills and in
1585 English Language Arts and mathematics standards as required by
1586 ss. 1002.67(1)(a) and 1003.41 and identify the educational
1587 strengths and needs of students.
1588 2. For students in the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education
1589 Program through grade 3, measure student performance in oral
1590 language development, phonological and phonemic awareness,
1591 knowledge of print and letters, decoding, fluency, vocabulary,
1592 and comprehension, as applicable by grade level, and, at a
1593 minimum, provide interval level and norm-referenced data that
1594 measures equivalent levels of growth.
1595 3. Be a valid, reliable, and developmentally appropriate
1596 computer-based direct instrument that provides screening and
1597 diagnostic capabilities for monitoring student progress;
1598 identifies students who have a substantial deficiency in reading
1599 or mathematics, including identifying students with
1600 characteristics of dyslexia, dyscalculia, and other learning
Page 64 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1601 disorders; and informs instruction. Any student identified by
1602 the system as having characteristics of dyslexia or dyscalculia
1603 shall undergo further screening. Beginning with the 2023-2024
1604 school year, the coordinated screening and progress monitoring
1605 system must be computer-adaptive.
1606 4. Provide data for Voluntary Prekindergarten Education
1607 Program accountability as required under s. 1002.68.
1608 5. Provide Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program
1609 providers, school districts, schools, teachers, and parents with
1610 data and resources that enhance differentiated instruction and
1611 parent communication.
1612 6. Provide baseline data to the department of each
1613 student's readiness for kindergarten. The determination of
1614 kindergarten readiness must be based on the results of each
1615 student's initial progress monitoring assessment in
1616 kindergarten. The methodology for determining a student's
1617 readiness for kindergarten must be developed by the department
1618 and aligned to the methodology adopted pursuant to s. 1002.68(3)
1619 s. 1002.68(4).
1620 7. Assess how well educational goals and curricular
1621 standards are met at the provider, school, district, and state
1622 levels and provide information to the department to aid in the
1623 development of educational programs, policies, and supports for
1624 providers, districts, and schools.
1625 (10) ANNUAL REPORT.—
Page 65 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1626 (b) Each district school board must annually publish on
1627 the district website the following information on the prior
1628 school year:
1629 1. The provisions of this section relating to public
1630 school student progression and the district school board's
1631 policies and procedures on student retention and promotion.
1632 2. By grade, the number and percentage of all students in
1633 grades 3 through 10 performing at Levels 1 and 2 on the
1634 statewide, standardized English Language Arts assessment.
1635 3. By grade, the number and percentage of all students
1636 retained in kindergarten through grade 10.
1637 4. Information on the total number of students who were
1638 promoted for good cause, by each category of good cause as
1639 specified in paragraph (7)(b).
1640 5. Any revisions to the district school board's policies
1641 and procedures on student retention and promotion from the prior
1642 year.
1643 6. The rate of chronic absenteeism by grade level for
1644 students in kindergarten through grade 5. For purposes of this
1645 subparagraph, the term "chronic absenteeism" means a student who
1646 has been absent for at least 10 percent of school days, or the
1647 same classes required for grade promotion, when enrolled for
1648 more than 45 days.
1649 Section 29. Subsection (5) of section 1008.33, Florida
1650 Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (6), and a new subsection
Page 66 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1651 (5) is added to that section, to read:
1652 1008.33 Authority to enforce public school improvement.—
1653 (5) The Department of Education must annually identify
1654 each school district in need of intervention and support to
1655 improve student academic performance.
1656 (a) A school district is in need of improvement if it has
1657 10 percent or more district-operated schools that earn a grade
1658 of "D" or "F" under s. 1008.34.
1659 (b)1. Each school district in need of improvement must
1660 annually submit a district improvement plan in a format
1661 prescribed by the department. The plan must include provisions
1662 to improve and monitor, at a minimum, all of the following:
1663 a. Instructional staff.
1664 b. Professional learning.
1665 c. Fiscal and staffing resources dedicated to school
1666 improvement.
1667 d. Student scheduling, attendance, and behavior.
1668 e. The use of continuous improvement and monitoring plans
1669 and processes.
1670 2. The plan must be approved by the district school board
1671 and may be reviewed by the State Board of Education for approval
1672 or denial. District school superintendents may be called before
1673 the state board to provide implementation updates.
1674 (c) A school district must submit, at a minimum, all of
1675 the following documents to the department as part its district
Page 67 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1676 improvement plan:
1677 1. Monthly vacancy reports for instructional personnel in
1678 schools receiving a grade of "D" or "F" under s. 1008.34.
1679 2. Monthly teacher absenteeism rates at schools receiving
1680 a grade of "D" or "F" under s. 1008.34.
1681 3. Monthly student absenteeism rates at schools receiving
1682 a grade of "D" or "F" under s. 1008.34.
1683 4. Monthly professional learning, activities, and
1684 expenditures for instructional staff in schools receiving a
1685 grade of "D" or "F" under s. 1008.34.
1686 5. Monthly professional learning, activities, and
1687 expenditures for school administrators in schools receiving a
1688 grade of "D" or "F" under s. 1008.34.
1689 6. Local progress monitoring results that are not part of
1690 the statewide progress monitoring system.
1691 (d) The state board may require modifications or revoke a
1692 school district's district improvement plan if the school
1693 district does not:
1694 1. Provide evidence of plan implementation or significant
1695 districtwide improvement.
1696 2. Submit deliverables in a format prescribed by the
1697 department or by a timeframe established by the department.
1698 Section 30. Paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of section
1699 1011.69, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1700 1011.69 Equity in School-Level Funding Act.—
Page 68 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1701 (4) After providing Title I, Part A, Basic funds to
1702 schools above the 75 percent poverty threshold, which may
1703 include high schools above the 50 percent threshold as permitted
1704 by federal law, school districts shall provide any remaining
1705 Title I, Part A, Basic funds directly to all eligible schools as
1706 provided in this subsection. For purposes of this subsection, an
1707 eligible school is a school that is eligible to receive Title I
1708 funds, including a charter school. The threshold for identifying
1709 eligible schools may not exceed the threshold established by a
1710 school district for the 2016-2017 school year or the statewide
1711 percentage of economically disadvantaged students, as determined
1712 annually.
1713 (a) Prior to the allocation of Title I funds to eligible
1714 schools, a school district may withhold funds only as follows:
1715 1. One percent for parent involvement, in addition to the
1716 one percent the district must reserve under federal law for
1717 allocations to eligible schools for parent involvement;
1718 2. A necessary and reasonable amount for administration
1719 which includes the district's indirect cost rate, not to exceed
1720 a total of 10 percent;
1721 3. A reasonable and necessary amount to provide:
1722 a. Homeless programs;
1723 b. Delinquent and neglected programs;
1724 c. Prekindergarten programs and activities;
1725 d. Private school equitable services; and
Page 69 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1726 e. Transportation for foster care children to their school
1727 of origin or choice programs; and
1728 4. A necessary and reasonable amount, not to exceed 1
1729 percent, for eligible schools to provide educational services in
1730 accordance with the approved Title I plan. Such educational
1731 services may include the provision of STEM curricula,
1732 instructional materials, and related learning technologies that
1733 support academic achievement in science, technology,
1734 engineering, and mathematics in Title I schools, including, but
1735 not limited to, technologies related to drones, coding,
1736 animation, artificial intelligence, cybersecurity, data science,
1737 the engineering design process, mobile development, and
1738 robotics. Funds may be reserved under this subparagraph only to
1739 the extent that all required reservations under federal law have
1740 been met and that such reservation does not reduce school-level
1741 allocations below the levels required under federal law.
1742 Section 31. Paragraphs (g) and (h) of subsection (6) of
1743 section 1012.56, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as
1744 paragraphs (f) and (g), respectively, and paragraph (b) of
1745 subsection (1), paragraph (f) of subsection (6), and subsection
1746 (9) of that section are amended, to read:
1747 1012.56 Educator certification requirements.—
1748 (1) APPLICATION.—Each person seeking certification
1749 pursuant to this chapter shall submit a completed application
1750 containing the applicant's social security number to the
Page 70 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1751 Department of Education and remit the fee required pursuant to
1752 s. 1012.59 and rules of the State Board of Education. Pursuant
1753 to the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity
1754 Reconciliation Act of 1996, each party is required to provide
1755 his or her social security number in accordance with this
1756 section. Disclosure of social security numbers obtained through
1757 this requirement is limited to the purpose of administration of
1758 the Title IV-D program of the Social Security Act for child
1759 support enforcement.
1760 (b) The department shall issue a temporary certificate to
1761 a qualifying applicant within 14 calendar days after receipt of
1762 a request from an employer with a professional education
1763 competence demonstration program pursuant to paragraph (6)(f)
1764 and subsection (9). The temporary certificate must cover the
1765 classification, level, and area for which the applicant is
1766 deemed qualified. The department shall electronically notify the
1767 applicant's employer that the temporary certificate has been
1768 issued and provide the applicant an official statement of status
1769 of eligibility at the time the certificate is issued.
1770
1771 The statement of status of eligibility must be provided
1772 electronically and must advise the applicant of any
1773 qualifications that must be completed to qualify for
1774 certification. Each method by which an applicant can complete
1775 the qualifications for a professional certificate must be
Page 71 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1776 included in the statement of status of eligibility. Each
1777 statement of status of eligibility is valid for 5 years after
1778 its date of issuance, except as provided in paragraph (2)(d).
1779 (6) MASTERY OF PROFESSIONAL PREPARATION AND EDUCATION
1780 COMPETENCE.—Acceptable means of demonstrating mastery of
1781 professional preparation and education competence are:
1782 (f) Successful completion of professional preparation
1783 courses as specified in state board rule, successful completion
1784 of a professional education competence program pursuant to
1785 subsection (9), and documentation of 3 years of being rated
1786 effective or highly effective under s. 1012.34 while holding a
1787 temporary certificate;
1788
1789 The State Board of Education shall adopt rules to implement this
1790 subsection, including rules to approve specific teacher
1791 preparation programs that are not identified in this subsection
1792 which may be used to meet requirements for mastery of
1793 professional preparation and education competence.
1794 (9) PROFESSIONAL EDUCATION COMPETENCY PROGRAM.—
1795 (a) Each school district must and a private school or
1796 state-supported public school, including a charter school, may
1797 develop and maintain a system by which members of the
1798 instructional staff may demonstrate mastery of professional
1799 preparation and education competence as required by law. Each
1800 program must:
Page 72 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1801 1. Be based on classroom application of the Florida
1802 Educator Accomplished Practices and instructional performance
1803 and, for public schools, must be aligned with the district's or
1804 state-supported public school's evaluation system established
1805 under s. 1012.34, as applicable.
1806 2. Include individualized plan tailored to each candidate
1807 to determine the appropriate professional learning plan.
1808 3. Monitor candidate performance to ensure candidates are
1809 meeting program expectations and implement a remediation process
1810 for candidates not meeting program performance expectations.
1811 4. Assign a mentor that meets the requirements of
1812 paragraph (7)(e) to each candidate participating in the program.
1813 (b) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules to
1814 Commissioner of Education shall determine the continued approval
1815 of programs implemented under this paragraph, based upon the
1816 department's review of performance data. The department shall
1817 review the performance data as a part of the periodic review of
1818 each school district's professional learning system required
1819 under s. 1012.98.
1820 Section 32. Subsection (8) of section 1013.03, Florida
1821 Statutes, is amended to read:
1822 1013.03 Functions of the department and the Board of
1823 Governors.—The functions of the Department of Education as it
1824 pertains to educational facilities of school districts and
1825 Florida College System institutions and of the Board of
Page 73 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1826 Governors as it pertains to educational facilities of state
1827 universities shall include, but not be limited to, the
1828 following:
1829 (8) Provide minimum criteria, procedures, and training to
1830 boards to conduct educational plant surveys and document the
1831 determination of future needs. No later than December 1, 2026,
1832 the department shall review and revise the Size of Space and
1833 Occupant Design Criteria section of the State Requirements for
1834 Educational Facilities based on input from stakeholders.
1835 Section 33. Paragraphs (d) and (f) of subsection (1) of
1836 section 1014.05, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1837 1014.05 School district notifications on parental rights.—
1838 (1) Each district school board shall, in consultation with
1839 parents, teachers, and administrators, develop and adopt a
1840 policy to promote parental involvement in the public school
1841 system. Such policy must include:
1842 (d) Procedures, pursuant to s. 1002.20(3)(d), for a parent
1843 to withdraw his or her minor child from any portion of the
1844 school district's instruction on reproductive health, including
1845 human embryologic and fetal development under s.
1846 1003.42(2)(o)6., or any disease, including HIV/AIDS
1847 comprehensive health education required under s. 1003.42(2)(o)
1848 that relates to sex education or instruction in acquired immune
1849 deficiency syndrome education or any instruction regarding
1850 sexuality if the parent provides a written objection to his or
Page 74 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1851 her minor child's participation. Such procedures must provide
1852 for a parent to be notified in advance of such course content so
1853 that he or she may withdraw his or her minor child from those
1854 portions of the course.
1855 (f) Procedures for a parent to learn about parental rights
1856 and responsibilities under general law, including all of the
1857 following:
1858 1. Pursuant to s. 1002.20(3)(d), the right to be notified
1859 in advance and to opt his or her minor child out of any portion
1860 of the school district's instruction on reproductive health,
1861 including human embryologic and fetal development under s.
1862 1003.42(2)(o)6., or any disease, including HIV/AIDS
1863 comprehensive health education required under s. 1003.42(2)(o)
1864 that relates to sex education instruction in acquired immune
1865 deficiency syndrome education or any instruction regarding
1866 sexuality.
1867 2. A plan to disseminate information, pursuant to s.
1868 1002.20(6), about school choice options, including open
1869 enrollment.
1870 3. In accordance with s. 1002.20(3)(b), the right of a
1871 parent to exempt his or her minor child from immunizations.
1872 4. In accordance with s. 1008.22, the right of a parent to
1873 review statewide, standardized assessment results.
1874 5. In accordance with s. 1003.57, the right of a parent to
1875 enroll his or her minor child in gifted or special education
Page 75 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1071 2026
1876 programs.
1877 6. In accordance with s. 1006.28(2)(a)1., the right of a
1878 parent to inspect school district instructional materials.
1879 7. In accordance with s. 1008.25, the right of a parent to
1880 access information relating to the school district's policies
1881 for promotion or retention, including high school graduation
1882 requirements.
1883 8. In accordance with s. 1002.20(14), the right of a
1884 parent to receive a school report card and be informed of his or
1885 her minor child's attendance requirements.
1886 9. In accordance with s. 1002.23, the right of a parent to
1887 access information relating to the state public education
1888 system, state standards, report card requirements, attendance
1889 requirements, and instructional materials requirements.
1890 10. In accordance with s. 1002.23(4), the right of a
1891 parent to participate in parent-teacher associations and
1892 organizations that are sanctioned by a district school board or
1893 the Department of Education.
1894 11. In accordance with s. 1002.222(1)(a), the right of a
1895 parent to opt out of any district-level data collection relating
1896 to his or her minor child not required by law.
1897 Section 34. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 76 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1071-03-c3